South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3932.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Clarendon County voting precincts SECTION 1.    Section 7-7-190 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-7-190.    (A) In Clarendon County there are the following voting precincts: Alcolu; Barrineau; Barrows Mill; Bloomville; Calvary; Davis Station; Harmony; Hicks; Home Branch; Jordan; Manning No. 1; Manning No. 2; Manning No. 3; Manning No. 4; Manning No. 5; New Zion; Oakdale; Paxville; Panola; Sardinia-Gable; Summerton No. 1; Summerton No. 2; Summerton No. 3; Summerton No. 4; Turbeville; and Wilson-Foreston. (B) The polling places for the above precincts must be determined by the Board of Voter Registration and Elections of Clarendon County with the approval of a majority of the Clarendon County Legislative Delegation. (C) The precinct lines defining the precincts as provided in subsection (A) are as shown on the official map prepared by and on file with the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office designated as document P-27-25. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 24th day of April, 2025. Approved the 28th day of April, 2025. __________